Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 1. Administration.

Collateral references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Master and Servant, § 139 et seq.

82 Am. Jur. 2d, Workers’ Compensation, § 1 et seq.

99 C.J.S., Workmen’s Compensation, § 1 et seq.

Ownership interest in employer business as affecting status as employee for workers’ compensation purposes. 28 ALR4th 973.

Sec. 23.30.001.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the legislature that

this chapter be interpreted so as to ensure the quick, efficient, fair, and predictable delivery of indemnity and medical benefits to injured workers at a reasonable cost to the employers who are subject to the provisions of this chapter;

workers’ compensation cases shall be decided on their merits except where otherwise provided by statute;

this chapter may not be construed by the courts in favor of a party;

hearings in workers’ compensation cases shall be impartial and fair to all parties and that all parties shall be afforded due process and an opportunity to be heard and for their arguments and evidence to be fairly considered.

History.

(§ 3 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 23.30.002.
Division of workers’ compensation; director.

The division of workers’ compensation is established in the department. The commissioner shall appoint the director of the division of workers’ compensation.

History.

(§ 17 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Sec. 23.30.005.
Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board.

The Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board consists of a southern panel of three members sitting for the first judicial district, two northern panels of three members sitting for the second and fourth judicial districts, five southcentral panels of three members each sitting for the third judicial district, and one panel of three members that may sit in any judicial district. Each panel must include the commissioner of labor and workforce development or a hearing officer designated to represent the commissioner, a representative of industry, and a representative of labor. The latter two members of each panel shall be appointed by the governor and are subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. The board shall by regulation provide procedures to avoid conflicts and the appearance of impropriety in hearings.

The commissioner shall act as chair and executive officer of the board and chair of each panel. The commissioner may designate a representative to act for the commissioner as chair and executive officer of the board. The commissioner may designate hearing officers to serve as chairs of panels for hearing claims.

The governor shall appoint the members of the panels. Each member, except the commissioner of labor and workforce development, serves a term of three years. The term of a management member and the term of a labor member of each panel may not expire in the same year. The management and labor members are entitled to compensation in the amount of $50 a day for each day or portion of a day spent in actual meeting or on authorized official business incidental to their duties and to all other transportation and per diem as provided by law.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 77 SLA 1979.]

A member of one panel may serve on another panel when the commissioner considers it necessary for the prompt administration of this chapter. Transfers shall be allowed only if a labor or management representative replaces a counterpart on the other panel.

Two members of a panel constitute a quorum for hearing claims and the action taken by a quorum of a panel is considered the action of the full board.

A claim may be heard by only one panel.

The department shall adopt rules for all panels, and procedures for the periodic selection, retention, and removal of both rehabilitation specialists and physicians under AS

23.30.041

and

23.30.095

, and shall adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The department may by regulation provide for procedural, discovery, or stipulated matters to be heard and decided by the commissioner or a hearing officer designated to represent the commissioner rather than a panel. If a procedural, discovery, or stipulated matter is heard and decided by the commissioner or a hearing officer designated to represent the commissioner, the action taken is considered the action of the full board on that aspect of the claim. Process and procedure under this chapter shall be as summary and simple as possible. The department, the board or a member of it may for the purposes of this chapter subpoena witnesses, administer or cause to be administered oaths, and may examine or cause to have examined the parts of the books and records of the parties to a proceeding that relate to questions in dispute. The superior court, on application of the department, the board or any members of it, shall enforce the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production and examination of books, papers, and records.

The department may adopt regulations concerning the medical care provided for in this chapter. In addition to the reports required of physicians under AS

23.30.095(a)

— (d), the board may direct a physician or hospital rendering medical treatment or service under this chapter to furnish to the board periodic reports of treatment or services on forms procured from the board.

The board may also arrange to have hearings held by the commission, officer, or tribunal having authority to hear cases arising under the workers’ compensation law of any other state, of the District of Columbia, or of any territory of the United States. The testimony and proceedings at the hearing shall be reported to the board and are a part of the record in the case. Evidence taken at the hearing is subject to rebuttal upon final hearing before the board.

The board shall notify the contracting agency of the state or of a political subdivision of the state when it revokes the self-insurance certificate of an employer holding a contract with the state or a political subdivision of the state.

Regulations adopted by the department under (h) and (i) of this section become effective only after approval by a majority of the full board.

The board may by regulation delegate authority to the director to assist the board in administering and enforcing this chapter.

History.

(§ 25 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 100 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 107 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 198 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 166 SLA 1972; am §§ 1, 2 ch 207 SLA 1976; am §§ 4 — 9 ch 77 SLA 1979; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 79 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 43 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 2002; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 10 FSSLA 2005; am § 21 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For regulations governing workers’ compensation matters, see 8 AAC 45.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

For self-insurance, see 8 AAC 46.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (

l

), substituted “only after approval” for “only after approved” following “become effective”.

Sec. 23.30.007.
Workers’ Compensation Appeals Commission.

There is established in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Commission. The commission has jurisdiction to hear appeals from final decisions and orders of the board under this chapter. Jurisdiction of the commission is limited to administrative appeals arising under this chapter.

The commission consists of five members appointed by the governor and confirmed by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. The members shall be appointed as follows:

a member appointed as chair who meets the requirements of (c)(2) of this section;

two members who meet the qualifications in (c)(1) of this section and, because of their employment or affiliations, may be classified as a representative of employees covered by this chapter;

two members who meet the qualifications in (c)(1) of this section and, because of their employment or affiliations, may be classified as a representative of employers covered by this chapter.

To be eligible for appointment under this section,

a member must

be a citizen of the United States;

be a resident of the state for the five years preceding the appointment;

have not been convicted of either a

felony; or

misdemeanor related to workers’ compensation; and

have served for a total of not less than 18 months as a member of the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board;

the chair must

meet the criteria specified in (1) of this subsection, except for the requirement in (1)(D) of this subsection;

be licensed to practice law in this state and be a member in good standing with the Alaska Bar Association; and

have engaged in the active practice of law for at least five years with experience in workers’ compensation in this state.

An individual seeking appointment as a member or as chair shall submit an application to the chief administrative law judge appointed under AS

44.64.010

. The application must show that the applicant meets requirements in (c) of this section that are applicable to the position for which the application is submitted. For each vacant position, other than the chair, the chief administrative law judge shall select not less than two eligible individuals and submit the names of those individuals to the governor. For the chair, the chief administrative law judge shall select not less than three for submission to the governor.

The term of service on the commission is five years. A member may be reappointed so long as the reappointment complies with the provisions of this section, including the application and appointment process described in (d) of this section.

A vacancy arising in the commission shall be filled by appointment by the governor and confirmed by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. Except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), an appointee selected to fill a vacancy shall hold office for the unexpired term of the member whose vacancy is filled. A vacancy in the commission does not impair the authority of a quorum of members to exercise all the powers and perform all the duties of the commission.

A member may act and receive compensation under this section from the date of appointment until confirmation or rejection by the legislature.

The chair of the commission is in the exempt service under AS

39.25.110

and shall receive a monthly salary that is not less than Step A nor more than Step F of Range 27 of the salary schedule in AS

39.27.011(a)

for Anchorage, Alaska.

An appeal to the commission shall be heard and decided by a three-member panel of the commission. An appeal panel shall consist of the chair of the commission and two members of the commission assigned by the chair, one member classified as representing employees, and one member classified as representing employers. At other meetings to conduct commission business, the number of commission members classified as representing employees must equal the number of commission members classified as representing employers. The chair of the commission and two representative members of the commission, one classified as representing employees and one classified as representing employers, constitute a quorum.

A member of the commission may be removed from office by the governor for good cause. To be removed for cause, a member of the commission shall be given a copy of the charges and afforded an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel in the member’s own defense upon not less than 10 days’ notice. If the member is removed for cause, the governor shall file with the lieutenant governor a complete statement of all charges made against the member, the governor’s findings on the charges, and the record of any proceedings. In this subsection, “good cause” includes

misconduct in office or violation of AS 39.52;

conviction of a felony;

conviction of a misdemeanor related to workers’ compensation;

inability to serve, neglect of duty, incompetence, unjustified failure to handle the caseload assigned, or similar nonfeasance of office; and

failure to continue to meet the requirements of this section relating to qualification for office.

Representative members are entitled to compensation in the amount of $400 a day for each day spent in actual hearing of appeals or on authorized official business incidental to their duties, and to transportation and per diem as provided by law. Compensation shall be paid pro rata for each portion of a day spent in actual hearing of appeals or on authorized official business.

A member of the commission may not hear an appeal under this chapter if

a party is an employee or was, in the past seven years, an employee of the commission member or of a business that employs the commission member; this paragraph does not apply to the chair of the commission when the State of Alaska is or was the employer of a party;

a party is a member or was, in the past seven years, a member of the same union or employee association as the commission member;

a party has a contractual relationship with the commission member, a business that employs the commission member, or a union or employee association of which the commission member is a member;

the commission member is unable to be fair, impartial, and unbiased toward the appeal participants; or

participation in the appeal is a violation of AS 39.52.

If the chair of the commission is unable to hear an appeal for reasons of absence or illness in excess of 10 days, or for reasons set out in (l) of this section, the chief administrative law judge appointed under AS

44.64.010

shall appoint a person who meets the qualifications of this section to serve as chair to hear the appeal as chair pro tempore. The person shall receive the compensation provided in (k) of this section. Appointment of a chair pro tempore does not require legislative confirmation.

Each member of the commission, before entering upon the duties of office, shall take and subscribe to the oath prescribed for principal officers of the state. A member of the commission, during tenure, may not

hold or campaign for elective office;

be an officer of a political party, political committee, or group;

permit the member’s name to be used, or make any contributions whatsoever, in support of or in opposition to a candidate or proposition or question that appears on any ballot in the state including that of a municipality; however, contributions may be made to a candidate for the office of President of the United States;

participate in any way in an election campaign or participate in or contribute to any political party; or

lobby, employ, or assist a lobbyist.

The offices of the commission shall be physically separate from the offices of the division.

Notwithstanding (e) of this section, the terms of the individuals initially appointed to the commission shall be as follows:

the chair, five years;

one member, four years;

one member, three years;

one member, two years;

one member, one year.

History.

(§ 8 ch 10 FSSLA 2005; am § 22 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 8 AAC 57.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (n)(3), deleted “but not limited to” following “any ballot in the state including”.

Sec. 23.30.008.
Powers and duties of the commission.

The commission shall be the exclusive and final authority for the hearing and determination of all questions of law and fact arising under this chapter in those matters that have been appealed to the commission, except for an appeal to the Alaska Supreme Court. The commission does not have jurisdiction in any case that does not arise under this chapter or in any criminal case. On any matter taken to the commission, the decision of the commission is final and conclusive, unless appealed to the Alaska Supreme Court, and shall stand in lieu of the order of the board from which the appeal was taken. Unless reversed by the Alaska Supreme Court, decisions of the commission have the force of legal precedent.

The commission, in its administrative capacity, shall maintain, index, and make available for public inspection the final administrative decisions and orders of the commission and of the board. The chair of the commission may review and circulate among the other members of the relevant commission appeal panel the drafts of the panel’s formal decisions and decisions upon reconsideration. The drafts are confidential documents and are not subject to disclosure.

The chair of the commission shall draft and propose, and the commission in its administrative capacity may adopt, regulations implementing the commission’s authority and duties under this chapter, including rules of procedure and evidence for proceedings before the commission under this chapter. The provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) apply to the adoption of regulations by the commission.

In an appeal, the commission shall award a successful party reasonable costs and, if the party is represented by an attorney, attorney fees that the commission determines to be fully compensatory and reasonable. However, the commission may not make an award of attorney fees against an injured worker unless the commission finds that the worker’s position on appeal was frivolous or unreasonable or the appeal was taken in bad faith.

The commission, in its administrative capacity, may adopt and alter an official seal and do all things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the powers expressly granted or necessarily implied in this chapter.

History.

(§ 8 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 8 AAC 57.

Sec. 23.30.009.
Powers and duties of the chair of the commission.

The chair of the commission shall exercise general supervision over the office of the commission and over appeals and shall direct the administrative functions of the commission. The chair of the commission shall serve as the executive officer of the commission and shall have authority in all administrative matters relating to the members. The chair may

employ and supervise commission staff and appoint a commission clerk;

establish and implement a time management system for the commission members and staff and manage the calendar of appeals;

assign the work of the commission members and staff so that appeals are resolved as expeditiously and competently as possible;

advise and cooperate with the board to develop appropriate procedures for maintenance and transfer of hearing files and the preservation and transfer of records on appeal; and

prepare an annual budget of the commission.

The chair of the commission shall preside over hearings and arguments on appeals. The chair of the commission shall ensure that all functions of the commission are performed with due regard for the rights of all parties and consistent with the orderly and prompt resolution of appeals. The chair of the commission shall rule on questions of procedure and advise the representative members of the commission on matters of law.

The chair of the commission shall, not later than March 15 of each year, make available to the public and file with the lieutenant governor a report regarding the commission for the prior calendar year, including data regarding time periods between initial receipt and final decisions on appeals.

The chair of the commission shall devote full time to the duties of the chair of the commission and may not engage in any other employment or business. The chair of the commission may not hold any other office or position under the United States, this state, any municipality or political subdivision of this state, or any tribal government or corporation. The chair of the commission may not hold office or position in a partisan political organization or party.

History.

(§ 8 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 8 AAC 57.

Sec. 23.30.010.
Coverage.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, compensation or benefits are payable under this chapter for disability or death or the need for medical treatment of an employee if the disability or death of the employee or the employee’s need for medical treatment arose out of and in the course of the employment. To establish a presumption under AS

23.30.120(a)(1)

that the disability or death or the need for medical treatment arose out of and in the course of the employment, the employee must establish a causal link between the employment and the disability or death or the need for medical treatment. A presumption may be rebutted by a demonstration of substantial evidence that the death or disability or the need for medical treatment did not arise out of and in the course of the employment. When determining whether or not the death or disability or need for medical treatment arose out of and in the course of the employment, the board must evaluate the relative contribution of different causes of the disability or death or the need for medical treatment. Compensation or benefits under this chapter are payable for the disability or death or the need for medical treatment if, in relation to other causes, the employment is the substantial cause of the disability or death or need for medical treatment.

Compensation and benefits under this chapter are not payable for mental injury caused by mental stress, unless it is established that (1) the work stress was extraordinary and unusual in comparison to pressures and tensions experienced by individuals in a comparable work environment; and (2) the work stress was the predominant cause of the mental injury. The amount of work stress shall be measured by actual events. A mental injury is not considered to arise out of and in the course of employment if it results from a disciplinary action, work evaluation, job transfer, layoff, demotion, termination, or similar action taken in good faith by the employer.

History.

(§ 33(1) ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 9 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For employees subject to this chapter, see AS

23.30.230

—

23.30.244

.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Opinions of attorney general. —

An employee who is a resident of Alaska and is employed by an Alaska resident employer, but who is injured in the scope of his employment while on a temporary, emergency job in Canada, is entitled to compensation under the Alaska Workmen’s Compensation Act, and the Alaska Workmen’s Compensation Board has jurisdiction over the case. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 35.

A business firm of foreign nationals who are acting as consultants for an Alaska fish products company is covered by the Alaska Workmen’s Compensation Act. 1966 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 9.

As to employment status of state board and commission members with regard to coverage under the state’s Workmen’s Compensation Act, see 1969 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

Sec. 23.30.011.
Extraterritorial coverage.

If an employee, while working outside the territorial limits of this state, suffers an injury on account of which the employee, or in the event of the employee’s death, the employee’s dependents, would have been entitled to the benefits provided by this chapter had the injury occurred in this state, the employee or, in the event of the employee’s death resulting from the injury, the employee’s dependents shall be entitled to the benefits provided by this chapter, if at the time of the injury

the employee’s employment is principally localized in this state;

the employee is working under a contract of hire made in this state in employment not principally localized in any state;

the employee is working under a contract of hire made in this state in employment principally localized in another state whose workers’ compensation law is not applicable to the employee’s employer; or

the employee is working under a contract of hire made in this state for employment outside the United States and Canada.

The payment or award of benefits under the workers’ compensation law of another state, territory, province, or foreign nation to an employee or the employee’s dependents otherwise entitled on account of the injury or death to the benefits under this chapter is not a bar to a claim for benefits under this chapter; however, a claim under this chapter must be filed within the time limits set out in this chapter. If compensation is paid or awarded under this section

the medical and related benefits furnished or paid for by the employer under another workers’ compensation law on account of the injury or death shall be credited against the medical and related benefits to which the employee would have been entitled under this chapter had claim been made solely under this chapter;

the amount of all income benefits paid or awarded the employee under another workers’ compensation law shall be credited against the total amount of income benefits which would have been due the employee under this chapter had claim been made solely under this chapter;

the total amount of death benefits paid or awarded under another workers’ compensation law shall be credited against the total amount of death benefits due under this chapter.

If an employee is entitled to the benefits of this chapter by reason of an injury sustained in this state in employment by an employer who is domiciled in another state and who has not secured the payment of compensation as required by this chapter, the employer or the employer’s carrier may file with the board a certificate, issued by the commission or agency of the other state having jurisdiction over workers’ compensation claims, certifying that the employer has secured the payment of compensation under the workers’ compensation law of the other state and that with respect to that injury the employee is entitled to the benefits provided under that law. In that event

the filing of the certificate shall constitute an appointment by the employer or the employer’s carrier of the board as the employer’s agent for acceptance of the service of process in a proceeding brought by the employee or the employee’s dependents to enforce the employee’s or their rights under this chapter on account of the injury;

the board shall send to the employer or carrier, by registered or certified mail to the address shown on the certificate, a true copy of any notice of claim or other process served on the director by the employee or the employee’s dependents in any proceeding brought to enforce the employee’s or their rights under this chapter;

if the employer is a qualified self-insurer under the workers’ compensation law of the other state, the employer, upon submission of evidence satisfactory to the board of the employer’s ability to meet the employer’s liability to the employee under this chapter, shall be considered to be a qualified self-insurer under this chapter;

if the employer’s liability under the workers’ compensation law of another state is insured, the employer’s carrier, as to the employee or the employee’s dependents only, shall be considered to be an insurer authorized to write insurance under and be subject to this chapter; however, unless its contract with the employer requires it to pay an amount equivalent to the compensation benefits provided by this chapter, its liability for income benefits or medical and related benefits may not exceed the amounts of the benefits for which the insurer would have been liable under the workers’ compensation law of the other state;

if the amount for which the employer’s insurance is liable under (3) and (4) of this subsection is less than the total of the compensation benefits to which the employee is entitled under this chapter, the board may, if it considers it necessary, require the employer to file security satisfactory to the board to secure the payment of benefits due the employee or the employee’s dependents under this chapter; and

upon compliance with the preceding requirements of this subsection, the employer, as to the employee only, shall be considered to have secured the payment of compensation under this chapter.

In this section

“carrier” includes an insurance company licensed to write workers’ compensation insurance in a state of the United States or a state or provincial fund that insures employers against their liabilities under a workers’ compensation law;

a person’s employment is “principally localized” in this or another state when (A) the person’s employer has a place of business in this or the other state and the person regularly works at or from that place of business, or (B), if (A) of this paragraph is not applicable, the person is domiciled and spends a substantial part of the person’s working time in the service of an employer in this or the other state; an employee whose duties require the employee to travel regularly in the service of an employer in this and one or more other states may, by written agreement with the employer, provide that the employment is principally localized in this or another state, and unless the other state refuses jurisdiction, the agreement shall be given effect under this chapter;

“state” includes a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a province of Canada;

“United States” includes only the states of the United States and the District of Columbia;

“workers’ compensation law” includes “occupational disease law.”

History.

(§ 1 ch 180 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

23.30.106

. Renumbered in 1981.
Subsection (d) was reorganized in 1984 to place the defined terms in alphabetical order.

Sec. 23.30.012.
Agreements in regard to claims.

At any time after death, or after 30 days subsequent to the date of the injury, the employer and the employee or the beneficiary or beneficiaries, as the case may be, have the right to reach an agreement in regard to a claim for injury or death under this chapter, but a memorandum of the agreement in a form prescribed by the director shall be filed with the division. Otherwise, the agreement is void for any purpose. Except as provided in (b) of this section, an agreement filed with the division discharges the liability of the employer for the compensation, notwithstanding the provisions of AS

23.30.130

,

23.30.160

, and

23.30.245

, and is enforceable as a compensation order.

The agreement shall be reviewed by a panel of the board if the claimant or beneficiary is not represented by an attorney licensed to practice in this state, the beneficiary is a minor or incompetent, or the claimant is waiving future medical benefits. If approved by the board, the agreement is enforceable the same as an order or award of the board and discharges the liability of the employer for the compensation notwithstanding the provisions of AS

23.30.130

,

23.30.160

, and

23.30.245

. The agreement shall be approved by the board only when the terms conform to the provisions of this chapter, and, if it involves or is likely to involve permanent disability, the board may require an impartial medical examination and a hearing in order to determine whether or not to approve the agreement. A lump-sum settlement may be approved when it appears to be to the best interest of the employee or beneficiary or beneficiaries.

History.

(§ 7(8) ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 42 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 99 SLA 1966; am § 10 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 23.30.210(b). Renumbered in 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Sec. 23.30.015.
Compensation where third persons are liable.

If on account of disability or death for which compensation is payable under this chapter the person entitled to the compensation believes that a third person other than the employer or a fellow employee is liable for damages, the person need not elect whether to receive compensation or to recover damages from the third person.

Acceptance of compensation under an award in a compensation order filed by the board operates as an assignment to the employer of all rights of the person entitled to compensation and the personal representative of a deceased employee to recover damages from the third person unless the person or representative entitled to compensation commences an action against the third person within one year after an award.

Payment of compensation into the second-injury fund as a result of death operates as an assignment to the employer of all rights of the representative of the deceased to recover damages from the third person.

An employer under an assignment may either institute proceedings for the recovery of damages or may compromise with a third person, either without or after instituting an action.

An amount recovered by the employer under an assignment, whether by action or compromise, shall be distributed as follows:

the employer shall retain an amount equal to

the expenses incurred by the employer with respect to the action or compromise, including a reasonable attorney fee determined by the board;

the cost of all benefits actually furnished by the employer under this chapter;

all amounts paid as compensation and second-injury fund payments, and if the employer is self-insured or uninsured, all service fees paid under AS

23.05.067

;

the present value of all amounts payable later as compensation, computed from a schedule prepared by the board, and the present value of the cost of all benefits to be furnished later under AS

23.30.095

as estimated by the board; the amounts so computed and estimated shall be retained by the employer as a trust fund to pay compensation and the cost of benefits as they become due and to pay any finally remaining excess sum to the person entitled to compensation or to the representative; and

the employer shall pay any excess to the person entitled to compensation or to the representative of that person.

Even if an employee, the employee’s representative, or the employer brings an action or settles a claim against the third person, the employer shall pay the benefits and compensation required by this chapter.

If the employee or the employee’s representative recovers damages from the third person, the employee or representative shall promptly pay to the employer the total amounts paid by the employer under (e)(1)(A) — (C) of this section insofar as the recovery is sufficient after deducting all litigation costs and expenses. Any excess recovery by the employee or representative shall be credited against any amount payable by the employer thereafter. If the employer is allocated a percentage of fault under AS

09.17.080

, the amount due the employer under this subsection shall be reduced by an amount equal to the employer’s equitable share of damages assessed under AS

09.17.080

(c).

If compromise with a third person is made by the person entitled to compensation or the representative of that person of an amount less than the compensation to which the person or representative would be entitled, the employer is liable for compensation stated in (f) of this section only if the compromise is made with the employer’s written approval.

If the employer is insured and the carrier has assumed the payment of compensation, the carrier shall be subrogated to all the rights of the employer.

Notice of the commencement of an action against a third party shall be given to the division and to all interested parties within 30 days.

History.

(§ 30 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 7 ch 42 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 1965; am § 2 ch 75 SLA 1977; am § 36 ch 26 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 89 SLA 2000; am §§ 11, 12 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Opinions of attorney general. —

When a carrier voluntarily pays all compensation due in a compensable claim under an award in a compensation order filed by the workmen’s compensation board, the carrier is not subrogated to the right of the employee to sue a third party tort-feasor within one year following the effective date of the award. 1966 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

A carrier can legally enter into an agreement with the workers in a compensable claim to sue a third party and to provide that the proceeds of the suit would be assigned as provided in this section. 1966 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

Sec. 23.30.017.
Immunity for third-party design professional.

A person entitled to compensation under this chapter as a result of injury occurring at the job site of a construction project may not bring a civil action to recover damages for that injury against a design professional or an employee of a design professional who provides professional services for the construction project.

This section does not apply to a person receiving compensation under this chapter who is injured at a job site at which the design professional or employee of the design professional

specifically assumed responsibility for job site safety practices under a contract;

actually exercises control over the premises where the injury occurred; or

prepared design plans or specifications, the plans or specifications contributed to the injury, and the plans or specifications were prepared negligently, recklessly, or with intentional misconduct.

In this section,

“design professional” means a person registered under AS 08.48 as an architect, engineer, or land surveyor;

“professional services” means services provided by a design professional that are within the scope of services for which the design professional is registered.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1995; am § 7 ch 20 SLA 2002)

Sec. 23.30.020.
Chapter part of contract of hire.

This chapter constitutes part of every contract of hire, express or implied, and every contract of hire shall be construed as an agreement on the part of the employer to pay and on the part of the employee to accept compensation in the manner provided in this chapter for all personal injuries sustained.

History.

(§ 35 ch 193 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.30.022.
False statements by employee.

An employee who knowingly makes a false statement in writing as to the employee’s physical condition in response to a medical inquiry, or in a medical examination, after a conditional offer of employment may not receive benefits under this chapter if

the employer relied upon the false representation and this reliance was a substantial factor in the hiring; and

there was a causal connection between the false representation and the injury to the employee.

History.

(§ 5 ch 79 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 23.30.020(b).
Renumbered in 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.